Washington statutes.
RCW 28A.310.030

ESD board—Membership—Board member district boundaries.

Except as otherwise provided in this chapter, in each educational service district there shall be an educational service district board consisting of seven members elected by the school directors of the educational service district, one from each of seven educational service district board-member districts. Board-member districts in districts reorganized under RCW 28A.310.020, or as provided for in RCW 28A.310.120 and under this section, shall be initially determined by the state board of education. If a reorganization pursuant to RCW 28A.310.020 places the residence of a board member into another or newly created educational service district, such member shall serve on the board of the educational service district of residence and at the next election called by the executive director of the Washington state school directors' association pursuant to RCW 28A.310.080 a new seven member board shall be elected. If the redrawing of board-member district boundaries pursuant to this chapter shall cause the resident board-member district of two or more board members to coincide, such board members shall continue to serve on the board and at the next election called by the executive director of the Washington state school directors' association a new board shall be elected. The board-member districts shall be arranged so far as practicable on a basis of equal population, with consideration being given existing board members of existing educational service district boards. Each educational service district board member shall be elected by the school directors of each school district within the educational service district. Beginning in 1971 and every ten years thereafter, educational service district boards shall review and, if necessary, shall change the boundaries of board-member districts so as to provide so far as practicable equal representation according to population of such board-member districts and to conform to school district boundary changes: PROVIDED, That all board-member district boundaries, to the extent necessary to conform with this chapter, shall be immediately redrawn for the purposes of the next election called by the executive director of the Washington state school directors' association following any reorganization pursuant to this chapter. Such district board, if failing to make the necessary changes prior to June 1st of the appropriate year, shall refer for settlement questions on board-member district boundaries to the office of the superintendent of public instruction, which, after a public hearing, shall decide such questions.

[ 2022 c 79 s 3; 2006 c 263 s 603; 1990 c 33 s 271; 1977 ex.s. c 283 s 14; 1975 1st ex.s. c 275 s 3; 1974 ex.s. c 75 s 1; 1971 ex.s. c 282 s 3; 1969 ex.s. c 176 s 3. Formerly RCW 28A.21.030, 28.19.510.]

NOTES:

Findings—Purpose—Part headings not law—2006 c 263: See notes following RCW 28A.150.230.

Severability—1977 ex.s. c 283: See note following RCW 28A.310.010.

Severability—1974 ex.s. c 75: "If any provision of this 1974 amendatory act, or its application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the remainder of the act, or the application of the provision to other persons or circumstances is not affected." [ 1974 ex.s. c 75 s 24.]

Severability—1971 ex.s. c 282: See note following RCW 28A.310.010.

Severability—Rights preserved—1969 ex.s. c 176: See notes following RCW 28A.310.010.

City, town, and district general elections—Exceptions—Special elections: RCW 29A.04.330.